Washington statutes.
RCW 19.112.005

Purpose.

It is desired that there should be uniformity among the requirements of the several states. This chapter provides for the establishment of quality specifications for all liquid motor fuels, except aviation fuel, marine fuel, and liquefied petroleum gases, and establishes a sampling, testing, and enforcement program.

[ 1990 c 102 s 1.]